Wisconsin, session 2025, SB679.
do enact as follows:SB679,11Section 1. 66.0511 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB679,2,3266.0511 (title) Law enforcement agencies; certain policies; 3prohibitions.SB679,24Section 2. 66.0511 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB679,2,14566.0511 (6) Prohibition on use of purchased personal data. (a) In this 6subsection, “personal data” means information collected from or generated by an 7individual as part of a consumer transaction or as part of the use of a consumer 8product or service that can be linked to the individual. “Personal data” includes an 9individual’s name, billing information, social security number, address, or 10demographic data; an individual’s Internet search history or browsing or use of 11applications; an individual’s actual or approximate location or location of a device 12owned or operated by the individual; an individual’s financial information, health 13information, biometric information, or characteristics of classifications protected 14under law; identifiers of devices; and content of communications by an individual.SB679,2,1615(b) Except as provided under par. (c), no law enforcement officer may do any of 16the following:SB679,2,18171. Request, obtain, or receive access to any individual’s personal data from a 183rd party in exchange for payment or a thing of value.SB679,2,22192. Request, obtain, or receive access to any individual’s personal data from a 20governmental entity if the law enforcement officer knows or should know that the 21governmental entity obtained or received it in exchange for payment or a thing of 22value.SB679,2,2323(c) Paragraph (b) does not apply if any of the following applies:SB679,3,211. The law enforcement officer has obtained a warrant under ch. 968 to obtain 2or receive access to the personal data of a specified individual.SB679,3,532. An emergency involving danger of death or serious physical injury to any 4individual exists and accessing the personal data is relevant to preventing the 5death or injury or to mitigating the injury.SB679,3,763. The personal data is available to the public through governmental records 7or media.SB679,3,984. The individual to whom the personal data is linked expressly consented to 9the law enforcement officer’s access to the specific personal data.SB679,3,1010